North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-24.7 Red River Valley Water Supply Project

61-24.7-01.
Legislative findings and intent — Authority to issue bonds.

The legislative assembly finds that the provision of water of sufficient quantity and quality to supply homes, businesses, industries, wildlife, and recreation in the Red River valley within this state is necessary for the protection of health, property, and enterprises and for the promotion of prosperity and the general welfare of the people of the Red River valley and that construction of the Red River valley water supply project involves and requires the exercise of the sovereign powers of the state and concerns a public purpose. Therefore, it is declared necessary and in the public interest that the state by and through the state water commission provide a share of the cost of constructing the Red River valley water supply project.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 559, § 1; 2009, ch. 602, § 1; 2013, ch. 490, § 12.

Law Reviews.

For Note: The Future of Quantifying Tribal Water Rights in North Dakota, see 84 N.D. L. Rev. 455 (2008).

61-24.7-02.
Funding — Red River valley water supply project — Bond issuance amount. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 490, § 24.

61-24.7-03.
Limitation of action. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 490, § 24.

61-24.7-04.
Bonds payable from water development trust fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 490, § 24.

61-24.7-05.
State funding plan.

The legislative assembly declares its intent to provide state funding for a share of the cost of constructing the Red River valley water supply project.

Any funds appropriated for the construction of the Red River valley water supply project may be carried over to future bienniums.

State funding for the Red River valley water supply project may be appropriated at the time and in the manner determined by the legislative assembly, either concurrently or separately from any federal funding that becomes available and the local funding for the Red River valley water supply project.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 559, § 5; 2009, ch. 602, § 3; 2013, ch. 490, § 13; 2017, ch. 427, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.